Illinois, session 104th, HB4159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-106 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-106)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-141)8    Sec. 1-106. Bicycle. Every device propelled by human power 9upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels 10except scooters and similar devices.11(Source: P.A. 85-951.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-141)13    Sec. 1-106. Bicycle. Every human-powered device and every 14low-speed electric bicycle, as defined in Section 1-140.10, 15with 2 or more wheels not less than 12 inches in diameter, 16operable pedals, and designated seats for the transportation 17of one or more persons.18(Source: P.A. 104-141, eff. 1-1-26.) 19    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 20changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 21that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section   HB4159- 2 -LRB104 15711 LNS 28893 b1represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 2not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 3made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 4Public Act. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.